Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2,108
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating the provisions of section 76-2,107 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than five days nor more than thirty days, or by both such a fine and imprisonment.

Laws 1969, c. 610, § 3, p. 2477.